Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1,109
State Acceptance of Gifts Act, how cited.

Sections 81-1,109 to 81-1,115 shall be known and may be cited as the State Acceptance of Gifts Act.

Laws 2024, LB998, § 1.